Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.150

Fees—Duty of board to set—Disposition.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The board shall set fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees collected under the provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, and 18.43.130 and fines collected under RCW 18.43.110 shall be paid into the professional engineers' account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury to be used to carry out the purposes and provisions of RCW 18.43.050, 18.43.060, 18.43.080, 18.43.100, 18.43.110, 18.43.120, 18.43.130, and all other duties required for operation and enforcement of this chapter. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer moneys from the professional engineers' account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

[ 2019 c 442 s 14; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 913; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 954; 1991 c 277 s 2; 1985 c 57 s 5; 1965 ex.s. c 126 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—1991 c 277: See note following RCW 18.85.061.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.